Wisconsin, session 2025, AB687.
do enact as follows:AB687,13Section 1. 29.185 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB687,2,2429.185 (1m) Department authority. If the wolf is not listed on the federal 5endangered list and is not listed on the state endangered list, the department shall 6allow the hunting and trapping of wolves and, shall regulate such hunting and 7trapping as provided in this section, and shall implement a wolf management plan 8that establishes a statewide wolf population goal. In regulating wolf hunting and 1trapping, the department may limit the number of wolf hunters and trappers and 2the number of wolves that may be taken by issuing wolf harvesting licenses.AB687,2,33